District of Columbia statutes.
47-1814.01a

Repealed

Persons engaging in a profession.

Repealed.

June 16, 1947, ch. 258, art. I, title XIV, § 1a
as added Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-145, § 103(b), 39 DCR 4895
Oct. 7, 1992, D.C. Law 9-177, § 9, 39 DCR 5868
Sept. 30, 1993, D.C. Law 10-25, § 110, 40 DCR 5489
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 45, 40 DCR 6311
Sept. 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-179, § 2, 41 DCR 5210
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1243(b), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-1814.1a.
D.C. Law 12-236, effective April 17, 1999, had amended § 47-1814.01a.